Texas, session 892, HB140.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subchapter A, Chapter 1201, Government Code, is amended by adding Section 1201.006 to read as follows: Sec. 1201.006.  LIMIT ON LOCAL GOVERNMENT DEBT. Notwithstanding any other law, including a provision in a municipal charter, a political subdivision may not authorize additional debt if the resulting annual debt service exceeds the limitation imposed by this section. The maximum annual debt service in any fiscal year on debt payable from property taxes may not exceed 10 percent of the amount equal to the average of the amount of property tax collections for the three preceding fiscal years. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.